Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5513.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406vv. (1) The department shall develop a uniform credentialing application under section 3406uu. (2) Section 3406uu does not require an insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy to violate or fail to meet a standard or requirement of a nationally recognized credentialing entity. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S03921'25) or House Bill No. 5512 (request no. H03921'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.